Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.590

American Indian health care delivery plan.

Consistent with funds appropriated specifically for this purpose, the department shall establish in conjunction with the area Indian health services system and providers an advisory group comprised of Indian and non-Indian health care facilities and providers to formulate an American Indian health care delivery plan. The plan shall include:

(1) Recommendations to providers and facilities methods for coordinating and joint venturing with the Indian health services for service delivery;

(2) Methods to improve American Indian-specific health programming; and

(3) Creation of co-funding recommendations and opportunities for the unmet health services programming needs of American Indians.

[ 1995 c 43 s 4; 1993 c 492 s 468. Formerly RCW 41.05.240.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 41.05.240 was amended and recodified as RCW 43.70.590 by 1995 c 43 without cognizance of the repeal by 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 9. For rule of construction concerning sections amended and repealed in the same legislative session, see RCW 1.12.025.

Effective dates—Contingent effective dates—1995 c 43: See note following RCW 70.05.030.

Severability—1995 c 43: See note following RCW 43.70.570.

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.